Oklahoma, session 2026, SB913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 311, O.S.L.


2023 (43A O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2-401.1), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 2-401.1. A. As used in this section, “emergency opioid


antagonist” means a drug including but not limited to naloxone that


blocks the effects of opioids and that is approved by the United


States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid


overdose.

Req. No. 949 Page 1


B. Subject to allocation of federal funding for the purchase of


emergency opioid antagonists, the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services shall provide emergency opioid antagonists


to the:


1. The Department of Corrections and to county jails for the


purpose of implementing Section 2 of this act 4.1 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. Boards of education of public school districts for the


purpose of implementing Section 1210.242 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


C. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services


shall prepare and provide an opioid overdose education program to


the:


1. The Department of Corrections and to county jails for the


purpose of implementing Section 2 of this act 4.1 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. School personnel authorized to administer an emergency


opioid antagonist under Section 1210.242 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes at the request of the board of education of the public


school district.


D. The education program shall:


1. Conform to guidelines of the Substance Abuse and Mental


Health Services Administration for opioid overdose education;


2. Explain the causes of an opioid overdose;

Req. No. 949 Page 2


3. Instruct when and how to administer in accordance with


medical best practices:


a. life-saving rescue techniques, and


b. an emergency opioid antagonist;


4. Explain how to contact appropriate emergency medical


services; and


5. Provide information on how to access emergency opioid


antagonists.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.242, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 219, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1210.242), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.242. A. Any school nurse, public health nurse,


licensed practitioner of the healing arts, nurse working under


contract with a school district or any person designated by the


school administration to administer an emergency opioid antagonist


in the event of a suspected overdose is authorized, regardless of


whether there is a prescription or standing order in place, to


administer an emergency opioid antagonist when encountering a


student or other individual exhibiting signs of an opioid overdose.


B. The administration of a public school may authorize one or


more persons Persons employed by the school to who are authorized to


administer emergency opioid antagonists under this section shall


receive training offered by the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services, a law enforcement agency or any other

Req. No. 949 Page 3


entity in recognizing the signs of an opioid overdose and


administering an emergency opioid antagonist. Persons designated to


receive this training may include, but are not limited to, the


certified and noncertified staff members required to receive annual


training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the Heimlich maneuver


under Section 1210.199 of this title. If in-person training is not


readily available in the area, the person or persons designated


under this provision may access emergency opioid antagonist training


materials available online through the State Department of Health or


another entity. Such training shall include information on how to


spot symptoms of an overdose, instruction in basic resuscitation


techniques, instruction on proper administration of an emergency


opioid antagonist and the importance of calling 911 for help.


C. In the absence of the person or persons specifically


designated and trained to administer an emergency opioid antagonist


under the provisions of this section, the administration of a school


may authorize any person, regardless of whether there is a


prescription or standing order in place, to administer an emergency


opioid antagonist to a student or other individual exhibiting signs


of an overdose.


D. Any person administering an emergency opioid antagonist to a


student or other individual at a school site or school-sponsored


event in a manner consistent with addressing opioid overdose shall


be covered under the Good Samaritan Act. A school and any of its

Req. No. 949 Page 4


employees or designees shall be immune from civil liability in


relation to the administration of an emergency opioid antagonist in


the event of a suspected overdose.


E. Subject to the provision of emergency opioid antagonists by


the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services under


Section 2-401.1 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, the board of


education of a public school district shall provide school personnel


authorized to administer an emergency opioid antagonist under this


section with doses of emergency opioid antagonists to carry on their


person or keep in their classrooms or workspaces in the event of an


overdose.


F. As used in this section, “emergency opioid antagonist” means


a drug including but not limited to naloxone that blocks the effects


of opioids and that is approved by the United States Food and Drug


Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-949 DC 1/19/2025 5:45:53 AM





Req. No. 949 Page 5